Nebraska, session 109, LB723.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB723 LB723
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 2. (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to adopt community
engagement requirements only to the extent such requirements are mandated
by federal law and with the following intentions:
(a) That the rights and health coverage of Nebraskans eligible for
medical assistance are protected;
(b) That all possible exemptions to community engagement
requirements are adopted and streamlined; and
(c) That ex parte processing is widespread and effective within the
medical assistance program.
(2) The department shall implement community engagement requirements
for the medical assistance program only as required by 42 U.S.C.
1396a(xx) as follows:
(a) The department shall adopt the full scope of short-term hardship
exemptions to the community engagement requirements allowed by federal
law and shall request such exemptions for qualified counties;
(b) The department shall adopt the broadest and most comprehensive
definition of medically frail as possible;
(c) The department shall accept a participant's statement to verify
compliance and exemption status to the maximum extent possible;
(d) The department shall utilize all available data sources to
assess compliance or exemption status, including, but not limited to,
managed care organization claims data and Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program data; and
(e) The department shall apply an income proxy to calculate eighty
hours of work at the federal minimum wage and automatically deem
participants with equal or higher monthly incomes to have met the
community engagement requirements.
-2-

LB723 LB723
2026 2026
(3) The department shall adopt community engagement requirements for
the medical assistance program only to the extent required by federal
law.
(4) The department shall implement community engagement requirements
no earlier than the date required by 42 U.S.C. 1396a(xx) or the federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, whichever is later.
Sec. 3. Original section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-